Maine, session 132, LD2125.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Emergency rate determination. The Department of Health and Human
Services shall establish an emergency rate determination process for services under Chapter
101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 97, Appendix D within 90 days in
accordance with the MaineCare rate system reform process as outlined in the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3173-J.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to establish an emergency fund to stabilize children's
residential care facility providers in danger of closing a facility or closing beds in a facility.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $0
3340 Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
3351 takes effect when approved.